Utah statutes.
58-31b-308.   Exemptions from licensure.

(1)  In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following persons may engage in acts included within the definition of the practice of nursing, subject to the stated circumstances and limitations, without being licensed under this chapter:

(a)  friends, family members, foster parents, or legal guardians of a patient performing gratuitous nursing care for the patient;

(b)  persons providing care in a medical emergency;

(c)  persons engaged in the practice of religious tenets of a church or religious denomination; and

(d)  after July 1, 2000, a person licensed to practice nursing by a jurisdiction that has joined the Nurse Licensure Compact to the extent permitted by Section 58-31c-102.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(d), the division may, in accordance with Section 58-31c-102, limit or revoke practice privileges in this state of a person licensed to practice nursing by a jurisdiction that has joined the Nurse Licensing Compact.

